Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.640

Writing, etc., false ticket or certificate—Influence—Penalty.

Any person who shall mark, stamp, or write any false weight ticket, scale ticket, or weight certificate, knowing it to be false, and any person who influences, or attempts to wrongfully influence, any licensed public weighmaster or weigher in the performance of his or her official duties shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars, or by imprisonment of not less than thirty days nor more than three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2017 c 158 s 13; 2011 c 96 s 16; 2010 c 8 s 6113; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 35.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.